Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1229
Subpoena; disobedience; refusal to testify or sign deposition; contempt.

Disobedience of a subpoena, or a refusal to be sworn, or to answer as a witness, or to subscribe a deposition, when lawfully ordered, may be punished as a contempt of the court or officer by whom his attendance or testimony is required.

R.S.1867, Code § 356, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 7921;

C.S.1922, § 8863;

C.S.1929, § 20-1229;

R.S.1943, § 25-1229.

Justice of peace before whom deposition is taken may punish as contempt refusal to be sworn or to answer questions. In re Hammond, 83 Neb. 636, 120 N.W. 203 (1909).

Notary public may commit for contempt witness refusing to answer. Dogge v. State, 21 Neb. 272, 31 N.W. 929 (1887).